Utah statutes.
10-9a-403.   Plan preparation.
(1) (a)  The planning commission shall provide notice, as provided in Section
10-9a-203, of its intent to make a recommendation to the municipal legislative
body for a general plan or a comprehensive general plan amendment when the
planning commission initiates the process of preparing its recommendation.
(b)  The planning commission shall make and recommend to the legislative body
a proposed general plan for the area within the municipality.
(c)  The plan may include areas outside the boundaries of the municipality if,
in the planning commission's judgment, those areas are related to the planning
of the municipality's territory.
(d)  Except as otherwise provided by law or with respect to a municipality's
power of eminent domain, when the plan of a municipality involves territory
outside the boundaries of the municipality, the municipality may not take
action affecting that territory without the concurrence of the county or other
municipalities affected.
(2) (a)  At a minimum, the proposed general plan, with the accompanying maps,
charts, and descriptive and explanatory matter, shall include the planning
commission's recommendations for the following plan elements:
(i)  a land use element that:
(A)  designates the long-term goals and the proposed extent, general
distribution, and location of land for housing, business, industry,
agriculture, recreation, education, public buildings and grounds, open space,
and other categories of public and private uses of land as appropriate; and
(B)  may include a statement of the projections for and standards of
population density and building intensity recommended for the various land use
categories covered by the plan;
(ii)  a transportation and traffic circulation element consisting of the
general location and extent of existing and proposed freeways, arterial and
collector streets, mass transit, and any other modes of transportation that
the planning commission considers appropriate, all correlated with the
population projections and the proposed land use element of the general plan;
and
(iii)  for cities, an estimate of the need for the development of additional
moderate income housing within the city, and a plan to provide a realistic
opportunity to meet estimated needs for additional moderate income housing if
long-term projections for land use and development occur.
(b)  In drafting the moderate income housing element, the planning commission:
(i)  shall consider the Legislature's determination that cities shall
facilitate a reasonable opportunity for a variety of housing, including
moderate income housing:
(A)  to meet the needs of people desiring to live there; and
(B)  to allow persons with moderate incomes to benefit from and fully
participate in all aspects of neighborhood and community life; and
(ii)  may include an analysis of why the recommended means, techniques, or
combination of means and techniques provide a realistic opportunity for the
development of moderate income housing within the planning horizon, which
means or techniques may include a recommendation to:
(A)  rezone for densities necessary to assure the production of moderate
income housing;
(B)  facilitate the rehabilitation or expansion of infrastructure that will
encourage the construction of moderate income housing;
(C)  encourage the rehabilitation of existing uninhabitable housing stock into
moderate income housing;
(D)  consider general fund subsidies to waive construction related fees that
are otherwise generally imposed by the city;
(E)  consider utilization of state or federal funds or tax incentives to
promote the construction of moderate income housing;
(F)  consider utilization of programs offered by the Utah Housing Corporation
within that agency's funding capacity; and
(G)  consider utilization of affordable housing programs administered by the
Department of Community and Culture.
(c)  In drafting the land use element, the planning commission shall:
(i)  identify and consider each agriculture protection area within the
municipality; and
(ii)  avoid proposing a use of land within an agriculture protection area that
is inconsistent with or detrimental to the use of the land for agriculture.
(3)  The proposed general plan may include:
(a)  an environmental element that addresses:
(i)  the protection, conservation, development, and use of natural resources,
including the quality of air, forests, soils, rivers and other waters,
harbors, fisheries, wildlife, minerals, and other natural resources; and
(ii)  the reclamation of land, flood control, prevention and control of the
pollution of streams and other waters, regulation of the use of land on
hillsides, stream channels and other environmentally sensitive areas, the
prevention, control, and correction of the erosion of soils, protection of
watersheds and wetlands, and the mapping of known geologic hazards;
(b)  a public services and facilities element showing general plans for
sewage, water, waste disposal, drainage, public utilities, rights-of-way,
easements, and facilities for them, police and fire protection, and other
public services;
(c)  a rehabilitation, redevelopment, and conservation element consisting of
plans and programs for:
(i)  historic preservation;
(ii)  the diminution or elimination of blight; and
(iii)  redevelopment of land, including housing sites, business and industrial
sites, and public building sites;
(d)  an economic element composed of appropriate studies and forecasts, as
well as an economic development plan, which may include review of existing and
projected municipal revenue and expenditures, revenue sources, identification
of basic and secondary industry, primary and secondary market areas,
employment, and retail sales activity;
(e)  recommendations for implementing all or any portion of the general plan,
including the use of land use ordinances, capital improvement plans, community
development and promotion, and any other appropriate action;
(f)  provisions addressing any of the matters listed in Subsection
10-9a-401(2); and
(g)  any other element the municipality considers appropriate.
